District of Columbia statutes.
19-602.24

Payment to designated agent.

A financial institution, on request of an agent under an agency designation for an account, may pay to the agent sums on deposit in the account, whether or not a party has a disability, is incapacitated, or deceased when the request is made or received, and whether or not the authority of the agent terminates on the disability or incapacity of a party.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 302(b), 48 DCR 2087
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 33(d), 53 DCR 6198
D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “has a disability, is” for “is disabled”.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 224 of the Uniform Nonprobate Transfers on Death Act (1991 Act).